Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-111
Definite failure of issue, defined.

Whenever property is limited upon the death of any person without heirs or heirs of the body or issue general or special, or descendants or offspring or children or any such relative described by other terms, such limitation, unless a different intent is effectively manifested, is a limitation to take effect only when such person dies not having such relative living at the time of his death or in gestation and born alive thereafter, and is not a limitation to take effect upon the indefinite failure of such relatives; nor, unless a different intent is effectively manifested, does it mean that death without such relative, in order to be material, must occur in the lifetime of the creator of the interest.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 11, p. 596;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1011;

R.S.1943, § 76-111.